Arkansas statutes. Title 8 Environmental Law
Chapter 5 Water Pollution Control Facilities
8-5-607. Service agreements generally.

In connection with a privatization contract, a local government, if authorized by ordinance of its governing body, may enter into one (1) or more service agreements with a private owner or operator pursuant to which the private owner or operator will provide one (1) or more sewer services or solid waste disposal services to or for the benefit of the local government.

The service agreement may provide for the purchase by the local government of all or any part of the capacity, capability, or output of the facilities used to provide the applicable sewer service or solid waste disposal service and shall contain such other terms and conditions as the local government and the private owner or operator may provide, including without limitation, the charges or rates for the services and a covenant by the local government to maintain rates sufficient to pay debt service incurred in connection with the financing of construction of a wastewater project or solid waste disposal project.

Prior to the execution of a service agreement, the local government shall publish notice of its intention to adopt an ordinance to accomplish the service agreement.

The notice shall:

Set forth a brief summary of the service agreement provisions; and

Set a time and place for a public hearing to be conducted by the chief executive.

The notice shall be published in a newspaper having general circulation within the county in which a substantial portion of the wastewater project or solid waste disposal project is located by one (1) publication each week for a period of two (2) weeks. The first publication shall be not less than fourteen (14) days prior to the adoption of the ordinance approving the execution of the service agreement.

The hearing may be held in conjunction with any hearing on the question of issuing bonds to finance the cost of the privatization project, on the question of adoption of the service agreement, or any other question.

A copy of the proposed service agreement shall be filed as a public record with the clerk of the local government not less than two (2) weeks prior to the adoption of the ordinance.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 690, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1992.4; Acts 1991, No. 629, § 6.

8-5-608. Privatization contracts and service agreements — Assignment.

The privatization contract or the service agreement may be assigned by either party to secure the performance of any obligation in connection with the financing of the construction or operation of a wastewater project or solid waste disposal project.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 690, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1992.3; Acts 1991, No. 629, § 7.

8-5-609. Privatization contracts, service agreements, etc. — Exemption from certain laws.

The privatization contract, the service agreement, and any other purchase by the local government in connection with the privatization contract shall not be subject to the provisions of §§ 14-22-101 — 14-22-115, 14-58-201 — 14-58-203, 14-58-301 — 14-58-303, 14-58-305, 14-58-306 [repealed], 14-58-307, and 14-58-308 or any other law, rule, or regulation requiring competitive bids.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 690, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1992.3; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 515.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment inserted “rule”.

8-5-610. Privatization contracts, service agreements, etc. — Exemption from Arkansas Public Service Commission's jurisdiction.

The service agreement, the privatization contract, the charges and rates for sewer or other service, and private owners or operators shall not be subject to Acts 1935, No. 324, as amended, and § 23-4-201, and shall be exempt from the jurisdiction of the Arkansas Public Service Commission and any other successor regulatory agency.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 690, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1992.4.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1935, No. 324 referred to in this section is codified as §§ 14-200-101, 14-200-103 — 14-200-108, 14-200-111, 23-1-101 — 23-1-112, 23-2-301, 23-2-303 — 23-2-308, 23-2-310, 23-2-312, 23-2-314 — 23-2-316, 23-2-402, 23-2-404 [repealed], 23-2-405, 23-2-408, 23-2-410 — 23-2-412, 23-2-414 — 23-2-421, 23-2-426, 23-2-428, 23-2-429, 23-3-101 — 23-3-107, 23-3-112 — 23-3-115, 23-3-118, 23-3-119, 23-3-201 — 23-3-206, 23-4-102, 23-4-103, 23-4-105 — 23-4-109, 23-4-205, 23-4-402 — 23-4-405, 23-4-407 — 23-4-418, 23-4-620 — 23-4-634, 23-18-101.

8-5-611. Tax exemption.

No income, sales, use, ad valorem, or other tax, assessment, or license shall be levied upon or collected with respect to any property which is held by or purchased by a private owner or operator for the public purpose of performing a privatization contract or a service agreement, since the property benefits the public.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 690, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1992.6.

8-5-612. Wastewater projects and solid waste disposal projects are industrial facilities for other acts.

For purposes of any other law, including without limitation, the Municipalities and Counties Industrial Development Revenue Bond Law, § 14-164-201 et seq., “facilities” or a similar term includes a wastewater project or solid waste disposal project as those terms are defined in this subchapter, so that any law adopted authorizing the issuance of industrial development bonds, industrial development revenue bonds, or similar evidences of indebtedness shall be available for utilization in connection with a privatization project.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 690, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 82-1992.7; Acts 1991, No. 629, § 8.

Subchapter 7
— Chronic Noncompliance

Effective Dates.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

8-5-701. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Chronic noncompliance” means conditions described in this subchapter that persist at a common sewage system after reasonable efforts by the Division of Environmental Quality to obtain compliance with applicable laws or rules in one (1) of the following:

Failure to obtain a permit as required by law;

Four (4) or more permit violations within a six-month period as set out in the permit issued by the division;

Failure to maintain the services of a certified wastewater treatment operator, where applicable; or

Demonstrable failure to operate the common sewage system so as to prevent the discharge of waterborne pollutants in unacceptable concentrations, as defined in the individual permit or the state's water quality standards, to the surface waters or groundwater of the state; and

“Common sewage system” means any sewage treatment system and its associated sewage collection and pumping facilities, nonmunicipal, publicly or privately owned, serving two (2) or more individually owned, rented, or temporarily occupied lots for the purpose of the collection or disposal of sewage.

“Common sewage system” includes systems owned or operated by:

Property owners' associations;

Nonmunicipal sewage improvement districts; and

Owners or managers of nonmunicipal residential subdivisions.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 336, § 1; 1999, No. 1164, § 45; 2019, No. 315, § 516; 2019, No. 910, § 2563.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in the introductory language of (1).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in the introductory language of (1); and substituted “division” for “department” in (1)(B).

8-5-702. Remedies for chronic violations.

The Division of Environmental Quality may petition a circuit court with competent jurisdiction and proper venue to remedy chronic violations by any common sewage system.

The circuit court may order any relief authorized by applicable laws, including:

The imposition of civil penalties;

The revocation of the entity's permit; and

A court order compelling the entity supplying potable water to the common sewage system to cut off the flow of potable water.

If the circuit court finds that circumstances prevent the owner or operator of a common sewage system from operating and maintaining the system in compliance with the law, the division shall nominate two (2) possible receivers, of which the court may appoint one (1) to operate the common sewage system, subject to the continuing jurisdiction of the circuit court.

Any such receiver appointed by the circuit court may exercise any and all legal powers and rights assigned by law to the original owner or operator of the common sewage system, but is immune to any personal liability associated with the operation of the common sewage system.

Once a receiver is appointed by the circuit court to operate the common sewage system, the circuit court may make available to the receiver funds pledged by the common sewage system under the minimal financial assurance provision of this subchapter, and, in addition, the receiver may assess rates as necessary to operate and maintain the common sewage system. The receiver is explicitly authorized to operate the common sewage system with the proceeds collected from the facilities which are connected to such common sewage system. The receiver shall receive a reasonable professional fee for this service, which shall be determined by the circuit court. The proceeds collected by the receiver shall be maintained in an account at a national bank located within the State of Arkansas. The receiver shall report to the circuit court, from time to time, how the proceeds have been collected and spent by the receiver.

If the circuit court determines that the permitted or registered entity cannot equitably satisfy the provisions of this subchapter or that no feasible alternatives exist, the circuit court shall so certify that determination to the division, which shall terminate the entity's permit, and the circuit court shall request a review by the Secretary of the Department of Health of the public health impact of an order compelling the entity supplying potable water to the common sewage system to cut off the flow of potable water.

If the secretary determines that a greater health hazard exists from the malfunctioning common sewage system than from the discontinuance of potable water service, then the secretary shall so certify this determination to the circuit court.

The circuit court shall then issue an order compelling the receiver to notify all users of such common sewage system, including landowners and tenants, of the secretary's determination.

Upon evidence of reasonable notice, the circuit court shall then issue the order to cut off the flow of potable water.

The division is authorized to institute a civil action in any court of competent jurisdiction to accomplish any or all of the following:

Restrain any violation of or compel compliance with the provisions of this subchapter and of rules, orders, permits, or plans issued pursuant thereto;

Affirmatively order remedial measures be taken as may be necessary or appropriate to implement or effectuate the purposes and intent of this subchapter;

Recover all costs, expenses, and damages to the division and any other agency or subdivision of the state in enforcing or effectuating the provisions of this subchapter, including, but not limited to, natural resource damages;

Assess civil penalties in an amount not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per day for violations of this subchapter and of any rules, permits, or plans issued pursuant thereto; or

Recover civil penalties assessed pursuant to § 8-4-103(c).

In addition to the remedies provided in subsections (a)-(e) of this section, the division shall have the authority to prohibit new or additional sewer line connections onto a common sewage system meeting the criteria established by § 8-5-701.

Once the division is satisfied that the common sewage system is in compliance with state and federal law, the division may authorize new or additional sewer line connections onto the common sewage system.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 336, § 1; 1997, No. 287, § 1; 1999, No. 1164, §§ 46-49; 2019, No. 315, §§ 517, 518; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2564-2569.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “regulations” following “rules” in (e)(1) and (e)(4).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” throughout the section; substituted “Secretary” for “Director” in (d)(1); substituted “secretary” for “Director of the Department of Health” twice in (d)(2)(A); and substituted “secretary’s” for “Director of the Department of Health’s” in (d)(2)(B).

8-5-703. Financial assurance requirements for subsequently permitted common sewage systems.

The Division of Environmental Quality may require a permitted common sewage system that is in chronic noncompliance to demonstrate to the division its financial ability to cover the estimated costs of operating and maintaining the common sewage system for a minimum period of five (5) years.

The division may require the permitted common sewage system that is in chronic noncompliance to submit a cost estimate for a third party to operate and maintain the common sewage system each year for a period of five (5) years.

The division shall not modify or renew a National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit or state permit for a common sewage system if the common sewage system facility is in chronic noncompliance and the common sewage system facility proposes to use new technology that in the discretion of the division cannot be verified to meet permit requirements.

The applicant's financial ability to operate and maintain the common sewage system for a period of five (5) years shall be demonstrated to the division by:

Obtaining insurance that specifically covers operation and maintenance costs;

Obtaining a letter of credit;

Obtaining a surety bond;

Obtaining a trust fund or an escrow account; or

Using a combination of insurance, letter of credit, surety bond, trust fund, or escrow account.

The division may require an amount of financial assurance that exceeds the cost estimate submitted by the applicant.

A financial instrument required by this section shall be posted to the benefit of the division and shall remain in effect for the life of the permit.

It is explicitly understood that the division shall not directly operate and shall not be responsible for the operation of any sewage system.

This section does not restrict local and county government entities from enacting more stringent ordinances regulating nonmunicipal domestic treatment sewage systems in Arkansas.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 336, § 1; 1999, No. 1164, §§ 50, 51; 2007, No. 832, § 2; 2009, No. 409, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 2570.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

As enacted by Acts 1995, No. 336, § 1, subdivision (a)(1) and subsection (b) began:

“After the effective date of this Act.” Acts 1995, No. 336, became effective July 28, 1995.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment rewrote the section.

The 2009 amendment rewrote (a) through (c), and made minor stylistic changes in (d) and (f).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a)(1)(A); and substituted “division” for “department” throughout the section.

Subchapter 8
— Small Business Revolving Loan Fund for Pollution Control and Prevention Technologies Act

Effective Dates.

Acts 1997, No. 691, § 6: July 1, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-First General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1997 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1997 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1997.”

Acts 2019, No. 82, § 23: July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the General Improvement Fund should no longer be utilized; that the Development and Enhancement Fund is necessary to complete unfinished state projects; and that this act is necessary to address infrastructure needs and unanticipated needs of the State of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

8-5-801. Title.

This subchapter may be called the “Small Business Revolving Loan Fund for Pollution Control and Prevention Technologies Act”.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 691, § 1.

8-5-802. Purpose.

It is the purpose of this subchapter to authorize the Division of Environmental Quality to establish and administer a revolving loan fund to encourage the investment in pollution control and prevention technologies in Arkansas. The fund will promote sustainable economic development in Arkansas by establishing a publicly capitalized fund to make loans to small businesses for projects to meet regulatory mandates in pollution control, to adopt pollution prevention technologies, or to implement waste reduction practices.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 691, § 1; 1999, No. 1164, § 52; 2001, No. 213, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 2571.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality”.

8-5-803. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Applicant” means any business concern operating within the State of Arkansas that meets the criteria of a person, corporation, partnership, or other business organization;

“Commission” means the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission;

[Repealed.]

[Repealed.]

“Pollution prevention” means reducing or eliminating the generation of pollutants and waste at the source.

“Pollution prevention” includes:

Process modifications and equipment acquisitions that promote the recovery and reuse of pollutants; and

The acquisition and installation of capital equipment, a process change, or a combination of capital equipment and process change.

“Pollution prevention” does not include investments in waste treatment processes or equipment, unless the waste treatment involves the recovery and reuse of pollutants; and

“Waste reduction” means handling or processing waste materials in a way that ultimately reduces the total quantity of waste disposed.

“Waste reduction” includes process modifications and equipment acquisitions that promote the recovery, reuse, or recycling of pollutants and wastes.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 691, § 1; 1999, No. 1164, §§ 53, 54; 2001, No. 213, § 2; 2005, No. 1254, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 519; 2019, No. 693, § 12; 2019, No. 910, § 2572.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2019, No. 315, § 519, amended former subdivision (5) of this section concerning the definition of “mandated environmental control” to insert the phrase “environmental law or duly adopted regulation” following “federal” and replace “regulation” with “rule” at the end of the subdivision. However, Acts 2019, No 693, § 12, specifically repealed this subdivision.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315, in former (5), inserted “environmental law or duly adopted regulation” and substituted “rule” for “regulation”.

The 2019 amendment by No. 693 deleted former (5); redesignated former (6) as (5); rewrote (5)(B) and (C); and deleted (5)(D).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 repealed (3) and (4).

8-5-804. Eligible activities.

Moneys deposited into the Small Business Revolving Loan Fund within the Division of Environmental Quality may be:

Loaned to eligible participants to pay the direct costs of projects which are designed to correct or avoid violations of federal environmental regulations or state environmental rules and have received a certificate of need from the division; or

Expended to pay costs incurred by the division to provide management of lending activities.

It is the purpose of this subchapter to authorize the division to establish and administer a revolving loan fund to encourage the investment in pollution control, pollution prevention, and waste reduction practices in Arkansas.

Such a fund will promote sustainable economic development in Arkansas by establishing a publicly capitalized revolving loan fund to make loans to small businesses for projects to meet regulatory mandates in pollution control or to adopt pollution prevention technologies.

Operating expenses associated with proofing a process change or equipment modification would be an eligible loan activity.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 691, § 1; 1999, No. 1164, § 55; 2001, No. 213, § 3; 2019, No. 315, § 520; 2019, No. 910, § 2573.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “federal environmental regulations or state environmental rules” for “federal or state environmental regulations” in (a)(1).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in the introductory language of (a); and substituted “division” for “department” in (a)(1), (a)(2), and (b)(1).

8-5-805. Eligible applicants.

An eligible applicant shall:

Employ one hundred (100) or fewer individuals, including both full-time and part-time employees, through direct hiring or contract, including affiliates and subsidiaries, at the time an application for a loan is received by the Division of Environmental Quality;

Provide proof of profitable operations and a demonstrated ability to repay the loan; and

Submit an application supplied by the division including any supporting documents, instruments, or other documents requested by the division for the purposes of recommending approval or disapproval of a loan described in this section.

Until all delinquent fees stated in this subsection or otherwise owed to the division are paid in full and no balance is due, the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality shall not approve any loan application.

The delinquent fees include, but are not limited to:

Permit fees;

Permit modification fees;

License fees;

Certification fees;

Registration fees;

Variance application fees;

Civil penalties;

Emergency response reimbursements;

Loan payments; and

Review fees.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 691, § 1; 2005, No. 1254, § 2; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2574-2576.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a)(1) and (b)(1); and substituted “division” for “department”
in (a)(3) twice and in (b)(1).

8-5-806. Terms of the revolving loan.

The maximum loan amount shall be:

Forty-five thousand dollars ($45,000) per mandated pollution control project;

Forty-five thousand dollars ($45,000) per pollution prevention project; and

Forty-five thousand dollars ($45,000) per waste reduction project.

The maximum allowable amount to be loaned shall not exceed sixty-five thousand dollars ($65,000) per individual applicant.

The maximum term of the loan shall be ten (10) years per mandated pollution control project and ten (10) years per pollution prevention or waste reduction project.

The interest rate shall be:

Established by the Division of Environmental Quality at or below market rate; and

Fixed for the term of each loan at the rate that is in effect when the loan application is received or when the loan is closed, whichever is lower.

The borrower shall be required to make level monthly amortizing payments to retire the debt by the end of the loan term.

Loan principal may be repaid in part or in full at any time without penalty.

The division may:

Make secured or unsecured loans with a promissory note;

Collect interest on any loans issued; and

Assess penalties on late loan payments.

Loans issued under this subchapter may contain an acceleration clause.

The division may bring any lawful action to recover any loan that is in default.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 691, § 1; 1999, No. 1164, § 56; 2001, No. 213, § 4; 2005, No. 1254, § 3; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2577-2579.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (c)(1); and substituted “division” for “department” in the introductory language of (e)(1), and in (f).

8-5-807. Small Business Revolving Loan Fund.

There is created within the Division of Environmental Quality a revolving loan fund:

Which shall be designated the “Small Business Revolving Loan Fund”;

Into which shall be transferred or deposited the moneys to be provided by law for the Small Business Revolving Loan Fund; and

To be used as a revolving fund by the division for making loans to eligible participants to pay the direct costs of projects that are designed to correct or avoid violations of federal environmental law or regulation or state environmental rules and have received a certificate of need from the division or to pay costs incurred by the division to provide management of lending activities.

There is established on the books of the Treasurer of State, the Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be known as the “Small Business Revolving Loan Fund”.

The Small Business Revolving Loan Fund shall consist of the following:

All funds transferred from the General Improvement Fund or its successor fund or fund accounts, including the Development and Enhancement Fund, to be otherwise provided by law for the Small Business Revolving Loan Fund;

All moneys received by the division upon repayment of loans made from the furnishing of funds for loans under the program created by this subchapter;

Interest earned upon any money in the Small Business Revolving Loan Fund; and

All sums recovered upon by the Small Business Revolving Loan Fund for losses to the Small Business Revolving Loan Fund or for loan losses under the loan program created in this subchapter and all other moneys received for the Small Business Revolving Loan Fund from any source.

Subject to the provisions of this subchapter, the division is vested with full power, authority, and jurisdiction over the Small Business Revolving Loan Fund, including all moneys and property or securities belonging to the Small Business Revolving Loan Fund.

The division may invest the Small Business Revolving Loan Fund in direct general obligations of the United States, in certificates of deposit or savings accounts in an amount not to exceed the capital funds, represented by capital, surplus, and undivided profits in financial institutions located in Arkansas that are insured by an agency of the United States Government, and in repurchase agreements that are collateralized by direct general obligations of the United States or by bonds, notes, debentures, participation certificates, or other obligations issued by an agency of the United States, the principal and interest of which are guaranteed by the agency or the United States.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 691, § 1; 1999, No. 1164, §§ 57, 58; 2005, No. 1254, § 4; 2019, No. 82, § 4; 2019, No. 315, § 521; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2580-2583.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2019, No. 82, § 1, provided: “Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the General Assembly that the creation of the Development and Enhancement Fund is necessary to provide a mechanism to disburse funds for:

“(1)

Various construction and improvement projects;

“(2)

Unforeseen needs;

“(3)

Funding deficiencies; and

“(4)

The completion of projects previously funded by the General Assembly”.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 82 inserted “or its successor fund or fund accounts, including the Development and Enhancement Fund” in (b)(2)(A).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “environmental law or regulations or state environmental rules” for “or state environmental regulations” in (a)(3).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in the introductory language of (a); and substituted “division” for “department” throughout the section.

Cross References.

Small Business Revolving Loan Fund, § 19-5-1105.

8-5-808. Administration of the program.

The Division of Environmental Quality will manage the program through its Small Business Assistance Program. The program is authorized to delegate the management of the Small Business Revolving Loan Fund. The division shall retain the power to issue certificates of need for eligible projects and shall not delegate such authority.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 691, § 1; 1999, No. 1164, § 59; 2019, No. 910, § 2584.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” and “division” for “department”.

Subchapter 9
— Long-Term Environmental Projects

Effective Dates.

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

8-5-901. Legislative findings and intent.

The General Assembly hereby finds that many areas of the state would benefit from long-term environmental remediation projects that significantly improve the effects caused by industrial or extractive activities. However, commitments by private enterprise to remedy such damages are discouraged by the prospect of civil liability based upon rigid application of state water quality standards to the enterprise's activities. The purpose of this subchapter is to preserve the state's approach to establishing water quality standards, while also encouraging private enterprises to make significant improvements to closed or abandoned sites that are of such magnitude that more than three (3) years would be required to complete the project.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 401, § 1.

8-5-902. Definitions and applicability.

As used in this subchapter:

“Commission” means the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission;

[Repealed.]

“Long-term improvement project” or “project” means any remediation or reclamation project at closed or abandoned:

Mineral extraction sites;

Solid waste management units as defined pursuant to the Arkansas Hazardous Waste Management Act of 1979, § 8-7-201 et seq.;

Oil and gas extraction sites;

Brownfield sites as defined in Acts 1995, No. 125, or as may be amended; and

Hazardous substance sites listed on the National Priorities List, 42 U.S.C. § 9605, or state priority list, § 8-7-509(f), or as may be amended; and

“Water quality standard” means standards developed through administrative rulemaking by the commission.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 401, § 2; 1999, No. 1164, § 60; 2013, No. 1127, § 4; 2019, No. 910, § 2585.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1995, No. 125, referred to in this section, is codified as §§ 8-7-503, 8-7-520, and 8-7-523 [repealed].

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment, in (3)(E), substituted “Priorities” for “Priority” and “§ 8-7-509(f)” for “§ 8-7-509(e)”.

The 2019 amendment repealed (2).

8-5-903. Procedures for approval of environmental projects, contents of applications, and public notice.

A petitioner seeking approval of a change in water quality standards to accommodate a long-term improvement project shall file with the Division of Environmental Quality a notice of intent, which includes as a minimum:

A description of the water body or stream segment affected by the project;

The existing ambient water quality for the use of criteria at issue;

The affected water quality standard;

The modifications sought;

The proposed remediation activities;

A proposed remediation plan, which shall contain:

A description of the existing conditions, including identification of the conditions limiting the attainment of the water quality standards;

A description of the proposed water quality standard modification, both during and post-project;

A description of the proposed remediation plan; and

The anticipated collateral effects, if any, of the remediation plan; and

A schedule for implementing the remediation plan that ensures that the post-project water quality standards are met as soon as reasonably practicable.

The division shall cause notice of the proposed project and associated water quality standard changes described in subsection (a) of this section to be published for public notice and comment in the same manner as provided for permit applications in § 8-4-203(c), and shall notify the public that the details of the proposed project are available for public review.

After considering comments from the public, the division shall notify the petitioner as to whether the proposed project is approved or denied.

The division may deny approval of a project if it reasonably concludes that:

The plan is not complete;

The plan is not technically sound;

The schedule is unrealistic;

The plan will not have an overall beneficial effect for the environment; or

For other appropriate reasons.

Any division determination on the approval or denial of a project is subject to the appeal procedures applicable to permitting decisions set out in § 8-4-205.

Upon approval of the project for further development, the petitioner shall prepare documentation required for third-party rulemaking by § 8-4-202 and established in administrative procedures.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 401, § 3; 2009, No. 409, § 3; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2586, 2587.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment, in (b), substituted “8-4-203(c)” for “8-4-203(b)” and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in the introductory language of (a); and substituted “division” for “department” in (b) and throughout (c).

8-5-904. Modification of water quality standards.

The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission may approve a modification where the water quality standard is not being maintained due to conditions which may, in part or in whole, be corrected through the implementation of long-term measures. The commission shall establish such subcategory of use and modify such general and specific standards as it deems appropriate to reflect such modification while ensuring that the fishable/swimmable use is maintained. In all water quality standard changes associated with long-term improvement projects, the remedial action plan described in § 8-5-903(a) shall be incorporated by reference in the statement of basis and purpose of the rule and shall be considered an essential condition of the modified water quality standard.

Once the commission approves a water quality standard modification, the Division of Environmental Quality shall ensure that conditions and limitations designed to achieve compliance with the plan are established in applicable discharge permits, consent administrative orders, or such other enforcement measures deemed appropriate by the division.

The division may allow modifications by the petitioner to the remediation plan and schedule as is deemed appropriate, provided that any such modifications to the original remedial action plan shall not render the project significantly less protective of the applicable use subcategory.

Should the division find that the petitioner is not acting in good faith to complete the project in accordance with the approved plan, applicable and appropriate enforcement authority may be exercised subject to appeal to the commission.

The division or the petitioner shall report annually to the commission on the progress of the project.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 401, § 4; 2019, No. 910, § 2588.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (b)(1); and substituted “division” for “department” throughout (b) and (c).

8-5-905. Project completion.

At the end of the long-term improvement project, the post-project water quality standards shall be in full force and effect.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 401, § 5.